District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.08

Removal of directors by shareholders.

(a)

The shareholders may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors shall be removed only for cause.

(b)

If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group shall participate in the vote to remove that director.

(c)

If cumulative voting is authorized, a director shall not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against removal. If cumulative voting is not authorized, a director shall be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove the director.

(d)

A director shall be removed by the shareholders only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720